North Carolina statutes. Chapter 50. Divorce and Alimony.
Article 1. Divorce, Alimony, and Child Support, Generally.
§ 50-13.13.
Motion or claim for relief from child support order based on finding of nonpaternity.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 60 of the North Carolina Rules of Civil Procedure, or any other provision of law, an individual who, as the father of a child, is required to pay child support under an order that was entered by a North Carolina court pursuant to Chapter 49, 50, 52C, or 110 of the General Statutes, or under an agreement between the parties pursuant to

G.S. 52-10.1

or otherwise, and that is subject to modification by a North Carolina court under applicable law may file a motion or claim seeking relief from a child support order as provided in this section.

A motion or claim for relief under this section shall be filed as a motion or claim in the cause in the pending child support action, or as an independent civil action, and shall be filed within one year of the date the moving party knew or reasonably should have known that he was not the father of the child. The motion or claim shall be verified by the moving party and shall state all of the following:

The basis, with particularity, on which the moving party believes that he is not the child’s father.

The moving party has not acknowledged paternity of the child or acknowledged paternity without knowing that he was not the child’s biological father.

The moving party has not adopted the child, has not legitimated the child pursuant to

G.S. 49-10

, 49-12, or 49-12.1, or is not the child’s legal father pursuant to

G.S. 49A-1

.

The moving party did not act to prevent the child’s biological father from asserting his paternal rights regarding the child.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem pursuant to

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 17, to represent the interest of the child in connection with a proceeding under this section.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 8-50.1(b1)

, the court shall, upon motion or claim of a party in a proceeding under this section, order the moving party, the child’s mother, and the child to submit to genetic paternity testing if the court finds that there is good cause to believe that the moving party is not the child’s father and that the moving party may be entitled to relief under this section. If genetic paternity testing is ordered, the provisions of

G.S. 8-50.1(b1)

shall govern the admissibility and weight of the genetic test results. The moving party shall pay the costs of genetic testing. If a party fails to comply with an order for genetic testing without good cause, the court may hold the party in civil or criminal contempt or impose appropriate sanctions under

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 37, of the North Carolina Rules of Civil Procedure, or both. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require additional genetic paternity testing if paternity has been set aside pursuant to

G.S. 49-14

or

G.S. 110-132

.

The moving party’s child support obligation shall be suspended while the motion or claim is pending before the court if the support is being paid on behalf of the child to the State, or any other assignee of child support, where the child is in the custody of the State or other assignee, or where the moving party is an obligor in a IV-D case as defined in

G.S. 110-129(7)

.The moving party’s child support obligation shall not be suspended while the motion or claim is pending before the court if the support is being paid to the mother of the child.

The court may grant relief from a child support order under this section if paternity has been set aside pursuant to

G.S. 49-14

or

G.S. 110-132

, or if the moving party proves by clear and convincing evidence, and the court, sitting without a jury, finds both of the following:

The results of a valid genetic test establish that the moving party is not the child’s biological father.

The moving party either (i) has not acknowledged paternity of the child or (ii) acknowledged paternity without knowing that he was not the child’s biological father. For purposes of this section, ‘acknowledging paternity’ means that the moving party has done any of the following:

Publicly acknowledged the child as his own and supported the child while married to the child’s mother.

Acknowledged paternity in a sworn written statement, including an affidavit of parentage executed under

G.S. 110-132

(a) or

G.S. 130A-101(f)

.

Executed a consent order, a voluntary support agreement under G.S. 110-132 or

G.S. 110-133

, or any other legal agreement to pay child support as the child’s father.

Admitted paternity in open court or in any pleading.

If the court determines that the moving party has not satisfied the requirements of this section, the court shall deny the motion or claim, and all orders regarding the child’s paternity, support, or custody shall remain enforceable and in effect until modified as otherwise provided by law. If the court finds that the moving party did not act in good faith in filing a motion or claim pursuant to this section, the court shall award reasonable attorneys’ fees to the prevailing party. The court shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law to support its award of attorneys’ fees under this subsection.

If the court determines that the moving party has satisfied the requirements of this section, the court shall enter an order, including written findings of fact and conclusions of law, terminating the moving party’s child support obligation regarding the child. The court may tax as costs to the mother of the child the expenses of genetic testing.Any unpaid support due prior to the filing of the motion or claim is due and owing. If the court finds that the mother of the child used fraud, duress, or misrepresentation, resulting in the belief on the part of the moving party that he was the father of the child, the court may order the mother of the child to reimburse any child support amounts paid and received by the mother after the filing of the motion or claim. The moving party has no right to reimbursement of past child support paid on behalf of the child to the State, or any other assignee of child support, where the child is in the custody of the State or other assignee, or where the moving party is an obligor in a IV-D case as defined in

G.S. 110-129(7)

.If the child was born in North Carolina and the moving party is named as the father on the child’s birth certificate, the court shall order the clerk of superior court to notify the State Registrar of the court’s order pursuant to G.S. 130A-118(b)(2). If relief is granted under this subsection, a party may, to the extent otherwise provided by law, apply for modification of or relief from any judgment or order involving the moving party’s paternity of the child.

Any servicemember who is deployed on military orders, and is subject to the protections of the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, shall have the period for filing a motion pursuant to subsection (b) of this section tolled during the servicemember’s deployment. If the period remaining allowed for the filing of the motion following the servicemember’s redeployment is less than 30 days, then the servicemember shall have 30 days for filing the motion.

History.

2011-328, s. 3.

Cross References.

As to civil actions to
establish paternity and
motion to set aside
paternity, see

G.S. 49-14

.

As to affidavit of parentage and motion
to set aside affidavit of
parentage, see

G.S. 110-132

.

§§ 50-14,
50-15.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1967, c. 1152, s. 1.

§ 50-16.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1967, c. 1152, s. 1; c. 1153, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to action or proceeding for custody of minor child, see

G.S. 50-13.1

et seq.

§ 50-16.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 319, s. 1.

Cross References.

For present definitions applicable to this Chapter, see

G.S. 50-16.1

A.

Legal Periodicals.

For article “Proposed Reforms in North Carolina Divorce Law,” see 8 N.C. Cent. L.J. 35 (1976).

For article dealing with marriage contracts as related to North Carolina law, see 13 Wake Forest L. Rev. 85 (1977).

For survey of 1979 family law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1471 (1980).

For note on enforcement of separation agreements by specific performance, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 117 (1980).

For note on separability of support and property provisions in ambiguous separation agreements, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 152 (1980).

For article on the rights of individuals to control the distributional consequences of divorce by private contract and on the interests of the State in preserving its role as a third party to marriage and divorce, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 819 (1981).

For survey of 1981 family law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1379 (1982).

For note, “Discarding the Dual Consent Judgment Approach in Family Law in Light of Walters v. Walters,

307 N.C. 381

, 298 S.E.2d 338 (1983),” see 20 Wake Forest L. Rev. 297 (1984).

For note, “Alimony Modification and Cohabitation in North Carolina,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 794 (1985).

For 1984 survey, “Equitable Distribution Without Consideration of Marital Fault,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 1204 (1985).

For note, “The Contingent Fee Contract in Domestic Relations Cases,” see 7 Campbell L. Rev. 427 (1985).

For comment, “Alimony Reform for North Carolina,” see 18 N.C. Cent. L.J. 87 (1989).

For note, “Post-Separation Failure to Support a Dependent Spouse as a Sole Ground for Alimony Despite the Absence of Marital Misconduct Before Separation — Brown v. Brown,” see 15 Campbell L. Rev. 333 (1993).

For note, “Kuder v. Schroeder: The North Carolina Court of Appeals Holds That a Professional Education Is Not Within the Spousal Duty of Support,” see 72 N.C.L. Rev. 1784 (1994).

For survey, “Termination of Lump Sum Alimony upon the Remarriage of a Dependent Spouse: Potts v. Tutterow,” see 73 N.C.L. Rev. 2432 (1995).

§ 50-16.1A.
Definitions.

As used in this Chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

“Alimony” means an order for payment for the support and maintenance of a spouse or former spouse, periodically or in a lump sum, for a specified or for an indefinite term, ordered in an action for divorce, whether absolute or from bed and board, or in an action for alimony without divorce.

“Dependent spouse” means a spouse, whether husband or wife, who is actually substantially dependent upon the other spouse for his or her maintenance and support or is substantially in need of maintenance and support from the other spouse.

“Marital misconduct” means any of the following acts that occur during the marriage and prior to or on the date of separation:

Illicit sexual behavior. For the purpose of this section, illicit sexual behavior means acts of sexual or deviate sexual intercourse, deviate sexual acts, or sexual acts defined in

G.S. 14-27.20(4)

, voluntarily engaged in by a spouse with someone other than the other spouse;

Involuntary separation of the spouses in consequence of a criminal act committed prior to the proceeding in which alimony is sought;

Abandonment of the other spouse;

Malicious turning out-of-doors of the other spouse;

Cruel or barbarous treatment endangering the life of the other spouse;

Indignities rendering the condition of the other spouse intolerable and life burdensome;

Reckless spending of the income of either party, or the destruction, waste, diversion, or concealment of assets;

Excessive use of alcohol or drugs so as to render the condition of the other spouse intolerable and life burdensome;

Willful failure to provide necessary subsistence according to one’s means and condition so as to render the condition of the other spouse intolerable and life burdensome.

(3a)

through (3d) Reserved for future codification purposes.

(3e)

“Payor” means any payor, including any federal, State, or local governmental unit, of disposable income to an obligor. When the payor is an employer, payor means employer as defined under 20 U.S.C. § 203(d) of the Fair Labor Standards Act.

“Postseparation support” means spousal support to be paid until the earlier of any of the following:

The date specified in the order for postseparation support.

The entry of an order awarding or denying alimony.

The dismissal of the alimony claim.

The entry of a judgment of absolute divorce if no claim of alimony is pending at the time of entry of the judgment of absolute divorce.

Termination of postseparation support as provided in

G.S. 50-16.9(b)

.

Postseparation support may be ordered in an action for divorce, whether absolute or from bed and board, for annulment, or for alimony without divorce. However, if postseparation support is ordered at the time of the entry of a judgment of absolute divorce, a claim for alimony must be pending at the time of the entry of the judgment of divorce.

“Supporting spouse” means a spouse, whether husband or wife, upon whom the other spouse is actually substantially dependent for maintenance and support or from whom such spouse is substantially in need of maintenance and support.

History.

1995, c. 319, s. 2; 1998-176, s. 8; 2005-177, s. 1; 2015-181, s. 20.

§ 50-16.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 319, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to alimony generally, see

G.S. 50-16.3

A.

§ 50-16.2A.
Postseparation support.

In an action brought pursuant to Chapter 50 of the General Statutes, either party may move for postseparation support. The verified pleading, verified motion, or affidavit of the moving party shall set forth the factual basis for the relief requested.

In ordering postseparation support, the court shall base its award on the financial needs of the parties, considering the parties’ accustomed standard of living, the present employment income and other recurring earnings of each party from any source, their income-earning abilities, the separate and marital debt service obligations, those expenses reasonably necessary to support each of the parties, and each party’s respective legal obligations to support any other persons.

Except when subsection (d) of this section applies, a dependent spouse is entitled to an award of postseparation support if, based on consideration of the factors specified in subsection (b) of this section, the court finds that the resources of the dependent spouse are not adequate to meet his or her reasonable needs and the supporting spouse has the ability to pay.

At a hearing on postseparation support, the judge shall consider marital misconduct by the dependent spouse occurring prior to or on the date of separation in deciding whether to award postseparation support and in deciding the amount of postseparation support. When the judge considers these acts by the dependent spouse, the judge shall also consider any marital misconduct by the supporting spouse in deciding whether to award postseparation support and in deciding the amount of postseparation support.

Nothing herein shall prevent a court from considering incidents of post date-of-separation marital misconduct as corroborating evidence supporting other evidence that marital misconduct occurred during the marriage and prior to date of separation.

History.

1995, c. 319, s. 2.

§ 50-16.3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 319, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to postseparation support, see

G.S. 50-16.2

A.

§ 50-16.3A.
Alimony.

Entitlement. — In an action brought pursuant to Chapter 50 of the General Statutes, either party may move for alimony. The court shall award alimony to the dependent spouse upon a finding that one spouse is a dependent spouse, that the other spouse is a supporting spouse, and that an award of alimony is equitable after considering all relevant factors, including those set out in subsection (b) of this section. If the court finds that the dependent spouse participated in an act of illicit sexual behavior, as defined in

G.S. 50-16.1

A(3)a., during the marriage and prior to or on the date of separation, the court shall not award alimony. If the court finds that the supporting spouse participated in an act of illicit sexual behavior, as defined in

G.S. 50-16.1

A(3)a., during the marriage and prior to or on the date of separation, then the court shall order that alimony be paid to a dependent spouse. If the court finds that the dependent and the supporting spouse each participated in an act of illicit sexual behavior during the marriage and prior to or on the date of separation, then alimony shall be denied or awarded in the discretion of the court after consideration of all of the circumstances. Any act of illicit sexual behavior by either party that has been condoned by the other party shall not be considered by the court.The claim for alimony may be heard on the merits prior to the entry of a judgment for equitable distribution, and if awarded, the issues of amount and of whether a spouse is a dependent or supporting spouse may be reviewed by the court after the conclusion of the equitable distribution claim.

Amount and Duration. — The court shall exercise its discretion in determining the amount, duration, and manner of payment of alimony. The duration of the award may be for a specified or for an indefinite term. In determining the amount, duration, and manner of payment of alimony, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including:

The marital misconduct of either of the spouses. Nothing herein shall prevent a court from considering incidents of post date-of-separation marital misconduct as corroborating evidence supporting other evidence that marital misconduct occurred during the marriage and prior to date of separation;

The relative earnings and earning capacities of the spouses;

The ages and the physical, mental, and emotional conditions of the spouses;

The amount and sources of earned and unearned income of both spouses, including, but not limited to, earnings, dividends, and benefits such as medical, retirement, insurance, social security, or others;

The duration of the marriage;

The contribution by one spouse to the education, training, or increased earning power of the other spouse;

The extent to which the earning power, expenses, or financial obligations of a spouse will be affected by reason of serving as the custodian of a minor child;

The standard of living of the spouses established during the marriage;

The relative education of the spouses and the time necessary to acquire sufficient education or training to enable the spouse seeking alimony to find employment to meet his or her reasonable economic needs;

The relative assets and liabilities of the spouses and the relative debt service requirements of the spouses, including legal obligations of support;

The property brought to the marriage by either spouse;

The contribution of a spouse as homemaker;

The relative needs of the spouses;

The federal, State, and local tax ramifications of the alimony award;

Any other factor relating to the economic circumstances of the parties that the court finds to be just and proper.

The fact that income received by either party was previously considered by the court in determining the value of a marital or divisible asset in an equitable distribution of the parties’ marital or divisible property.

Findings of Fact. — The court shall set forth the reasons for its award or denial of alimony and, if making an award, the reasons for its amount, duration, and manner of payment. Except where there is a motion before the court for summary judgment, judgment on the pleadings, or other motion for which the Rules of Civil Procedure do not require special findings of fact, the court shall make a specific finding of fact on each of the factors in subsection (b) of this section if evidence is offered on that factor.

In the claim for alimony, either spouse may request a jury trial on the issue of marital misconduct as defined in

G.S. 50-16.1

A. If a jury trial is requested, the jury will decide whether either spouse or both have established marital misconduct.

History.

1995, c. 319, s. 2; c. 509, s. 135.2(b); 1998-176, s. 11.

§ 50-16.4.
Counsel fees in actions for alimony, postseparation support.

At any time that a dependent spouse would be entitled to alimony pursuant to

G.S. 50-16.3

A, or postseparation support pursuant to

G.S. 50-16.2

A, the court may, upon application of such spouse, enter an order for reasonable counsel fees, to be paid and secured by the supporting spouse in the same manner as alimony.

History.

1967, c. 1152, s. 2; 1995, c. 319, s. 3; 2010-14, s. 1.

§ 50-16.5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 319, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to alimony generally, see

G.S. 50-16.3

A.

§ 50-16.6.
When alimony, postseparation support, counsel fees not payable.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 319, s. 4.

Alimony, postseparation support, and counsel fees may be barred by an express provision of a valid separation agreement, premarital agreement, or marital contract made pursuant to

G.S. 52-10(a1)

so long as the agreement is performed.

History.

1871-2, c. 193, s. 39; Code, s. 1292; Rev., s. 1567; 1919, c. 24; C.S., s. 1667; 1921, c. 123; 1923, c. 52; 1951, c. 893, s. 3; 1953, c. 925; 1955, cc. 814, 1189; 1967, c. 1152, s. 2; 1995, c. 319, s. 4; c. 509, s. 135.3(f); 2013-140, s. 2.

§ 50-16.7.
How alimony and postseparation support paid; enforcement of decree.

Alimony or postseparation support shall be paid by lump sum payment, periodic payments, income withholding, or by transfer of title or possession of personal property or any interest therein, or a security interest in or possession of real property, as the court may order. The court may order the transfer of title to real property solely owned by the obligor in payment of lump-sum payments of alimony or postseparation support or in payment of arrearages of alimony or postseparation support so long as the net value of the interest in the property being transferred does not exceed the amount of the arrearage being satisfied. In every case in which either alimony or postseparation support is allowed and provision is also made for support of minor children, the order shall separately state and identify each allowance.

The court may require the supporting spouse to secure the payment of alimony or postseparation support so ordered by means of a bond, mortgage, or deed of trust, or any other means ordinarily used to secure an obligation to pay money or transfer property, or by requiring the supporting spouse to execute an assignment of wages, salary, or other income due or to become due.

If the court requires the transfer of real or personal property or an interest therein as a part of an order for alimony or postseparation support as provided in subsection (a) or for the securing thereof, the court may also enter an order which shall transfer title, as provided in

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 70 and

G.S. 1-228

.

The remedy of arrest and bail, as provided in Article 34 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes, shall be available in actions for alimony or postseparation support as in other cases.

The remedies of attachment and garnishment, as provided in Article 35 of Chapter 1 and Article 9 of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes, shall be available in actions for alimony or postseparation support as in other cases, and for such purposes the dependent spouse shall be deemed a creditor of the supporting spouse.

The remedy of injunction, as provided in Article 37 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes and

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 65, shall be available in actions for alimony or postseparation support as in other cases.

Receivers, as provided in Article 38 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes, may be appointed in actions for alimony or postseparation support as in other cases.

A dependent spouse for whose benefit an order for the payment of alimony or postseparation support has been entered shall be a creditor within the meaning of Article 3A of Chapter 39 of the General Statutes pertaining to voidable transactions.

A judgment for alimony or postseparation support obtained in an action therefor shall not be a lien against real property unless the judgment expressly so provides, sets out the amount of the lien in a sum certain, and adequately describes the real property affected; but past-due periodic payments may by motion in the cause or by a separate action be reduced to judgment which shall be a lien as other judgments.

Any order for the payment of alimony or postseparation support is enforceable by proceedings for civil contempt, and its disobedience may be punished by proceedings for criminal contempt, as provided in Chapter 5A of the General Statutes.Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 1-294

or

G.S. 1-289

, an order for the periodic payment of alimony that has been appealed to the appellate division is enforceable in the trial court by proceedings for civil contempt during the pendency of the appeal. Upon motion of an aggrieved party, the court of the appellate division in which the appeal is pending may stay any order for civil contempt entered for alimony until the appeal is decided if justice requires.

The remedies provided by Chapter 1 of the General Statutes Article 28, Execution; Article 29B, Execution Sales; and Article 31, Supplemental Proceedings, shall be available for the enforcement of judgments for alimony and postseparation support as in other cases, but amounts so payable shall not constitute a debt as to which property is exempt from execution as provided in Article 16 of Chapter 1C of the General Statutes.

The specific enumeration of remedies in this section shall not constitute a bar to remedies otherwise available.

(
l
1)

The dependent spouse may apply to the court for an order of income withholding for current or delinquent payments of alimony or postseparation support or for any portion of the payments. If the court orders income withholding, a notice of obligation to withhold shall be served on the payor as required by

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4, Rules of Civil Procedure. Copies of the notice shall be filed with the clerk of court and served upon the supporting spouse by first-class mail.

History.

1967, c. 1152, s. 2; 1969, c. 541, s. 5; c. 895, s. 18; 1977, c. 711, s. 26; 1985, c. 482, s. 1; c. 689, s. 18; 1995 c. 319, s. 5; 1998-176, ss. 2, 3; 1999-456, s. 14; 2015-23, s. 3.

Local Modification.

Person: 1967, c. 848, s. 2.

Cross References.

As for garnishment of government employee benefits, see 42 U.S.C. 659 and 10 U.S.C. 1408.

§ 50-16.8.
Procedure in actions for postseparation support.

When an application is made for postseparation support, the court may base its award on a verified pleading, affidavit, or other competent evidence. The court shall set forth the reasons for its award or denial of postseparation support, and if making an award, the reasons for its amount, duration, and manner of payment.

History.

1871-2, c. 193, ss. 37, 38, 39; 1883, c. 67; Code, ss. 1290, 1291, 1292; Rev., ss. 1565, 1566, 1567; 1919, c. 24; C.S., ss. 1665, 1666, 1667; 1921, c. 123; 1923, c. 52; 1951, c. 893, s. 3; 1953, c. 925; 1955, cc. 814, 1189; 1961, c. 80; 1967, c. 1152, s. 2; 1971, c. 1185, s. 25; 1979, c. 709, s. 4; 1995, c. 319, s. 6.

Cross References.

As to court having jurisdiction over alimony proceedings, see

G.S. 7A-244

.

§ 50-16.9.
Modification of order.

An order of a court of this State for alimony or postseparation support, whether contested or entered by consent, may be modified or vacated at any time, upon motion in the cause and a showing of changed circumstances by either party or anyone interested. This section shall not apply to orders entered by consent before October 1, 1967.Any motion to modify or terminate alimony or postseparation support based on a resumption of marital relations between parties who remain married to each other shall be determined pursuant to

G.S. 52-10.2

.

If a dependent spouse who is receiving postseparation support or alimony from a supporting spouse under a judgment or order of a court of this State remarries or engages in cohabitation, the postseparation support or alimony shall terminate. Postseparation support or alimony shall terminate upon the death of either the supporting or the dependent spouse.As used in this subsection, cohabitation means the act of two adults dwelling together continuously and habitually in a private heterosexual relationship, even if this relationship is not solemnized by marriage, or a private homosexual relationship. Cohabitation is evidenced by the voluntary mutual assumption of those marital rights, duties, and obligations which are usually manifested by married people, and which include, but are not necessarily dependent on, sexual relations. Nothing in this section shall be construed to make lawful conduct which is made unlawful by other statutes.

When an order for alimony has been entered by a court of another jurisdiction, a court of this State may, upon gaining jurisdiction over the person of both parties in a civil action instituted for that purpose, and upon a showing of changed circumstances, enter a new order for alimony which modifies or supersedes such order for alimony to the extent that it could have been so modified in the jurisdiction where granted.

History.

1871-2, c. 193, ss. 38, 39; 1883, c. 67; Code, ss. 1291, 1292; Rev., ss. 1566, 1567; 1919, c. 24; C.S., ss. 1666, 1667; 1921, c. 123; 1923, c. 52; 1951, c. 893, s. 3; 1953, c. 925; 1955, cc. 814, 1189; 1961, c. 80; 1967, c. 1152, s. 2; 1987, c. 664, s. 3; 1995, c. 319, s. 7.

Cross References.

As to distribution by court of marital property upon divorce, see

G.S. 50-20

.

§ 50-16.10.
Alimony without action.

Alimony without action may be allowed by confession of judgment under

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 68.1.

History.

1967, c. 1152, s. 2; 1985, c. 689, s. 19.

§ 50-16.11.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 319, s. 1.

§ 50-17.
Alimony in real estate, writ of possession issued.

In all cases in which the court grants alimony by the assignment of real estate, the court has power to issue a writ of possession when necessary in the judgment of the court to do so.

History.

1868-9, c. 123, s. 1; Code, s. 1293; Rev., s. 1568; C.S., s. 1668.

§ 50-18.
Residence of military personnel; payment of defendant’s travel expenses by plaintiff.

In any action instituted and prosecuted under this Chapter, allegation and proof that the plaintiff or the defendant has resided or been stationed at a United States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, or Air Force installation or reservation or any other location pursuant to military duty within this State for a period of six months next preceding the institution of the action shall constitute compliance with the residence requirements set forth in this Chapter; provided that personal service is had upon the defendant or service is accepted by the defendant, within or without the State as by law provided.

Upon request of the defendant or attorney for the defendant, the court may order the plaintiff to pay necessary travel expenses from defendant’s home to the site of the court in order that the defendant may appear in person to defend said action.

History.

1959, c. 1058; 2011-183, s. 39.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-183, s. 39, effective June 20, 2011, substituted “Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, or Air Force” for “army, navy, marine corps, coast guard or air force” in the first paragraph.

Legal Periodicals.

For note concerning residence requirement for servicemen, see 40 N.C.L. Rev. 343 (1962).

For comment, “Conflicts of Law in Divorce Litigation: A Looking-Glass World?,” see 10 Campbell L. Rev. 145 (1987).

§ 50-19.
Maintenance of certain actions as independent actions permissible.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 13(a), any action for divorce under the provisions of

G.S. 50-5.1

or

G.S. 50-6

that is filed as an independent, separate action may be prosecuted during the pendency of an action for:

Alimony;

Postseparation support;

Custody and support of minor children;

Custody and support of a person incapable of self-support upon reaching majority; or

Divorce pursuant to

G.S. 50-5.1

or

G.S. 50-6

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 13(a), any action described in subdivision (a)(1) through (a)(5) of this section that is filed as an independent, separate action may be prosecuted during the pendency of an action for divorce under

G.S. 50-5.1

or

G.S. 50-6

.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 569, s. 1.

History.

1979, c. 709, s. 2; 1985, c. 689, s. 20; 1991, c. 569, s. 1; 1995, c. 319, s. 10.

§ 50-19.1.
Maintenance of certain appeals allowed.

Notwithstanding any other pending claims filed in the same action, a party may appeal from an order or judgment adjudicating a claim for absolute divorce, divorce from bed and board, the validity of a premarital agreement as defined by

G.S. 52B-2(1)

, child custody, child support, alimony, or equitable distribution if the order or judgment would otherwise be a final order or judgment within the meaning of

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 54(b), but for the other pending claims in the same action. A party does not forfeit the right to appeal under this section if the party fails to immediately appeal from an order or judgment described in this section. An appeal from an order or judgment under this section shall not deprive the trial court of jurisdiction over any other claims pending in the same action.

History.

2013-411, s. 2; 2018-86, s. 1.